test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-krutk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kruțk: # Noun 62 'eng /est kark/fin' - full paradigm
     kruțk+N+Sg+Nom: kruțk
     kruțk+N+Sg+Gen: kruțk
     kruțk+N+Sg+Par: kruțkõ
     kruțk+N+Sg+Dat: kruțkõ
     kruțk+N+Sg+Ins: kruțkõ
     kruțk+N+Sg+Ill: kruțkõ
     kruțk+N+Sg+Ela: kruțkstõ
     kruțk+N+Pl+Nom: kruțkīd
     kruțk+N+Pl+Gen: kruțkīd
     kruțk+N+Pl+Par: kruțkīdi
     kruțk+N+Pl+Dat: kruțkīdõn
     kruțk+N+Pl+Ins: kruțkīdõks
     kruțk+N+Pl+Ill: kruțkīž
     kruțk+N+Pl+Ela: kruțkīst
